Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-2102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Act:

(1) Assessment means a quality assurance and access assessment imposed on hospitals pursuant to section 68-2103;

(2) Department means the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Department of Health and Human Services;

(3) Hospital means a hospital as defined in section 71-419 or a rural emergency hospital as described in section 71-477;

(4) Medical assistance program means the medical assistance program established pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act; and

(5) Net patient revenue means the revenue paid to a hospital for patient care, room, board, and services less contractual adjustments, bad debt, and revenue from sources other than operations, including, but not limited to, interest, guest meals, gifts, and grants.

Laws 2024, LB1087, § 2.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.